New Jersey, session 221, S2488.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Every county prosecutor shall notify the Director of the Office of Public Integrity and Accountability prior to beginning a criminal investigation regarding allegations of misconduct by a State, county, or municipal law enforcement officer. b.    Upon receiving notification pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the Office of Public Integrity and Accountability shall supervise the criminal investigation for the purpose of ensuring the investigation is conducted in an objective manner. c.     Whenever there is an allegation of misconduct by a State, county, or municipal law enforcement officer, the Attorney General may supersede the county prosecutor of the county in which the incident occurred for the purpose of conducting any investigation, criminal action, or proceeding if, in the opinion of the Attorney General, the interests of the State will be furthered by doing so. d.    As used in this section: Law enforcement officer means a person whose public duties include the power to act as an officer for the detection, apprehension, arrest, and conviction of offenders against the laws of this State. Office of Public Integrity and Accountability means the Office of Public Integrity and Accountability in the Department of Law and Public Safety established to conduct sensitive investigations, including those involving allegations of misconduct by law enforcement officers. e.     The Attorney General shall issue or amend guidelines or directives necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month after enactment.